District of Columbia statutes.
47-4105

Fraudulent withholding information or failure to supply information to employer.

A person required under this title, or under regulations made under authority thereof, to furnish withholding information or supply information to an employer, who willfully furnishes false or fraudulent withholding information or other information, or willfully fails to furnish withholding information or other information to an employer in the manner and at the time prescribed under this title, or under regulations made under authority thereof, shall, in addition to other penalties provided by law, be guilty of a misdemeanor, and, upon conviction thereof, shall be fined not more than the amount set forth in [§ 22-3571.01], or imprisoned not more than 180 days, or both, together with costs of prosecution. All prosecutions under this section shall be brought in the Superior Court of the District of Columbia on information by the Attorney General for the District of Columbia in the name of the District.

Oct. 4, 2000, D.C. Law 13-204, § 2(b), 47 DCR 5799
Apr. 13, 2005, D.C. Law 15-354, § 73(n)(5), 52 DCR 2638
June 11, 2013, D.C. Law 19-317, § 286(ff), 60 DCR 2064
Applicability of D.C. Law 19-317: Section 401 of D.C. Law 19-317 provided that the act shall apply only to offenses committed on or after June 11, 2013.
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 286(ff) of the Criminal Fine Proportionality Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-45, April 1, 2013, 60 DCR 5400, 20 DCSTAT 1300).
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-317 substituted “not more than the amount set forth in [§ 22-3571.01]” for “not more than $3,000”.
D.C. Law 15-354 substituted “Attorney General for the District of Columbia” for “Corporation Counsel”.
This section is referenced in § 16-801.